Hawaii statutes.
§225M-3 Cooperation. The office of
planning shall seek the widest possible cooperation from public and private
agencies and individuals and the federal government to achieve the purposes of
this chapter. It shall work closely with and assist the counties in the
promotion of coordinated state and county planning.

Every state department, county agency, or other
public or private agencies or individuals providing planning programs and
services shall be encouraged to participate actively in the activities of the
office of planning. The executive heads of all state departments and agencies
shall cooperate with the office of planning by providing information as the
governor and the director of business, economic development, and tourism [deem]
necessary for the effective discharge of its duties.

Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to
delegate or detract in any way from the functions, powers, and duties conferred
by law on any department or agency of the State or county. [L 1987, c 336, pt
of §1; am L 1996, c 299, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next